Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-10,131
Class V school district; sale of site; appraisers; appointment; oath.

The court shall, after entry of the decree under section 79-10,130, appoint three appraisers to ascertain the fair value of the real estate as described in section 79-10,127 and the improvements thereon. Such appraisers shall be disinterested freeholders residing within the school district who are qualified by knowledge and experience to determine the fair value of property of the particular character involved. The appraisers shall, before entering upon their duties, take and subscribe an oath that they will support the United States Constitution and the Constitution of Nebraska and will faithfully and impartially discharge their duties as required by law.

Laws 1955, c. 319, § 5, p. 986;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1065;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 777.